Florida, session 2026, SB414.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSection 106.1405, Florida Statutes, is amended 20 to read: 21 106.1405âUse of campaign funds.â 22 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 23 (a)ââCampaign-related child care expensesâ means the costs 24 associated with the care of a candidateâs dependent child due to 25 campaign activities, such as participating in campaign events, 26 canvassing, participating in debates, and meeting with 27 constituents or donors. 28 (b)ââEligible child care providerâ means any individual or 29 licensed organization that provides child care services, 30 including center-based, family-based, and in-home care, for 31 compensation; is legally operating under state law; and complies 32 with all applicable state and local requirements for the 33 provision of child care services. 34 (2)âA candidate or the spouse of a candidate may not use 35 funds on deposit in a campaign account of such candidate to 36 defray normal living expenses for the candidate or the 37 candidateâs family, other than expenses actually incurred for 38 transportation, meals, and lodging by the candidate or a family 39 member during travel in the course of the campaign. 40 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), a candidate may use 41 funds on deposit in his or her campaign account to pay for 42 campaign-related child care expenses if the expense would not 43 exist were it not for the candidateâs campaign and if the 44 following conditions are met: 45 (a)âCampaign funds may not be used for child care expenses 46 unrelated to campaign activities, such as personal errands or 47 routine child care. 48 (b)âThe candidate maintains and provides to the division, 49 upon request, clear records of all campaign-related child care 50 expenses reimbursed by campaign funds, including dates, times, 51 and descriptions of campaign events in which the candidate 52 engaged. 53 1.âReceipts or invoices from the eligible child care 54 provider, along with proof of payment, must be maintained for 55 auditing purposes for at least 3 years after the campaign ends. 56 2.âA candidate shall disclose the use of campaign funds for 57 campaign-related child care expenses in his or her regular 58 campaign finance reports, specifying the amounts and dates of 59 such expenses. 60 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.